Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 6. Other Assistance

Editor's note. —

Laws 2006, ch. 72, § 3, directs that no reimbursement be made under the act for periods of service before its effective date.

Appropriation. —

Laws 2006, ch 72, § 2 appropriates as follows: “One million one hundred fifty thousand five hundred dollars ($1,150,500.00) from the general fund to the Wyoming military department for the purposes of this act.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 72, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2006.

§ 19-9-601.
Wyoming national guard members group life insurance premium.

The Wyoming national guard members group life insurance premium assistance plan is established to reimburse qualified members of the Wyoming national guard for group life insurance premiums. The plan shall be administered by the adjutant general in accordance with the provisions of this article. The adjutant general shall promulgate rules for the administration, implementation and proper utilization of the plan.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 72, § 1; 2008, ch. 52, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “guard members” for “guard servicemembers”.

§ 19-9-602.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Premium” means the cost of servicemembers group life insurance determined as provided in 38 U.S.C. § 1969(a)(1) or the cost of state sponsored life insurance as determined by the insurers;

“Qualified member” means an active member in good standing of the Wyoming national guard;

“Servicemembers group life insurance” means that life insurance issued to a qualified member pursuant to 38 U.S.C., Chapter 19;

“State sponsored life insurance” means the group life insurance program pursuant to 37 U.S.C. 707.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 72, § 1; 2008, ch. 52, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (a)(i) inserted “or the cost of state sponsored life insurance as determined by the insurers”; and added (a)(iv).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 19-9-603.
Requirements for premium reimbursement.

Subject to legislative appropriation and in accordance with the provisions of this article, the adjutant general or his designee, may authorize the reimbursement of premiums for qualified members who:

Have completed basic military training or officer training unless waived by the adjutant general for good cause shown;

Meet the standards for satisfactory participation in the active Wyoming national guard at the beginning of and throughout the entire term for which premium is reimbursed;

Are committed through an enlistment contract or other written agreement to membership in the active Wyoming national guard for not less than six (6) years, including initial enlistment and any previous contract or contracts.

A qualified member meeting the requirements of subsection (a) of this section may receive reimbursement for premiums paid by the member during the previous calendar year for servicemembers group life insurance or state sponsored life insurance, with a coverage amount of up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00). Premiums for members of the qualified member’s family and premiums paid or reimbursed by the United States shall not be reimbursed.

Reimbursement of eligible premium paid during a calendar year shall be made annually no later than May 1 of the following year, based upon certified payroll disbursements from the federal payment authority.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 72, § 1; 2008, ch. 52, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “reimbursement” for “payment” in the introductory language of (a); inserted “or state sponsored life insurance” in (b).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, ch. 72, § 3, directs that no reimbursement be made under the act for periods of service before its effective date.